dev/transliterate/ara-cyrl.twol
Alphabet 

 А Ә Б В Г Ғ Д Е Ё Ж З И І Й К Қ Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ұ Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
 а ә б в г ғ д е ё ж з и і й к қ л м н ң о ө п р с т у ұ ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ь ы ъ э ю я

 ء:0
 ا:а
 ە:е
 ه:h
 ې:е
 ب:б
 ت:т
 پ:п
 ج:ж
 چ:ч
! خ:х
 ح:х
 د:д
 ر:р
 ز:з
 ژ:ж
 س:с
 ش:ш
 ع:ғ
 ف:ф
 ق:қ
 ك:к
 گ:г
 ڭ:ң
 ل:л
 م:м
 ن:н
 ھ:һ
 و:о
 ۇ:ұ
 ۋ:у
 ى:ы
 ي:й
 ۆ:в


 ;


Sets 

BackVow = ا ۇ و ;

FrontCns = ك گ ;

Cns = ب ت پ ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ ۋ ى ي ;

CyrCns = б в г ғ д ж з й к қ л м н ң п р с т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ;

FrontVow = ە ;

CyrFrontVow = ә е і ү ө ;

CyrBackVow = а ұ ы о ;

CyrVow = ә е і ү ө а ұ ы о ;

AraYotVow = ا و ۋ ە ;

YotVow = я ё ю е ;

Rules 

"front some vow" 
Vx:Vy <=> ء:0 Cns:* _ ;
          FrontCns: ( ۋ: | ي: ) _ ; ! ←
          _ ( Cns:* ) [ ك: | گ: ] ;
          ې: Cns:* _ ;
          _ Cns:* [ FrontVow: ] ;
          [ FrontVow: ] Cns:* _ ;
          :CyrFrontVow Cns:* _ ;
          _ FrontCns: ;
      except
!          \[ ك: | گ: ] ي: _ ;
          :CyrBackVow [ ۋ: | ي: ]* _ ;
!          [ [ [ :CyrVow :CyrCns ] | [ :ю | :и ] ] - FrontCns:] :CyrCns* _ \FrontCns: ;  ! термос, but солтүстік
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۇ ى ) ! و 
          Vy in ( ә ү і ) ! ө 
      matched ;

"front o, but only in fist syllables"
و:ө <=> ء:0 Cns:* _ ;
         FrontCns: ( ۋ: | ي: ) _ ; ! ←
         _ ( Cns:* ) [ ك: | گ: ] ;
         ! ې: Cns:* _ ;
         ! _ Cns:* [ FrontVow: ] ;
         ! [ FrontVow: ] Cns:* _ ;
         ! :CyrFrontVow Cns:* _ ;
         ! _ FrontCns: ;


"й letters"
Vx:Vy <=> ي: _ ;
      except
          :CyrFrontVow [ ۋ: | ي: ]* _ ;
!          ر: ا: ي: _ ن: ;  ! район
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۋ )   !  و
          Vy in ( я ю )   !  ё
      matched ;

"й:0 for й letters"
ي:0 <=> _ AraYotVow: ;
!ي:0 <=> _ :YotVow ;
    except
        ر: ا: _ و: ن: ;
!        :CyrCns _ ;
        Cns: _ ;

"ي is и after consonants"
ي:и <=> Cns: _ ;
!ي:и <=> :CyrCns _ ;
!ي:и <=> :CyrCns _ :CyrCns ;

!"ۋ to ю after ي:и"
!ۋ:ю <=> ي:и _ ;
